Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. State Parks.
§ 10.1-205.
Management of False Cape State Park.

The Director shall adopt measures to safeguard the environment of False Cape State Park. These shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Provisions to ensure that adequate drinking water and environmentally sound sewage disposal are provided for visitors to the Park;

Adequate measures to protect the dunes, wildlife, and sensitive areas of the Park;

Adequate measures to protect, wherever practicable, nesting areas of sea turtles, beach nesting birds, peregrine falcons, and other endangered species.

The Director shall be responsible for providing that law-enforcement, fire and rescue services are available for the Park.

The Director shall consider limiting visitors into the Park to less than 2,000 per day if such a lower limit is necessary to preserve the Park environment.

The Director shall consider further limiting visitors into the Park during certain portions of the year if such a limitation is necessary to preserve the environment of the Park and of the Back Bay National Wildlife Refuge.

No motor powered vehicle of any kind shall be permitted upon the land of False Cape State Park except as follows:

A public transportation system operated by the Department, or its licensee or designee, to transport not more than 2,000 persons per day into and out of the Park;

Official vehicles of the Commonwealth and of the City of Virginia Beach;

Vehicles engaged in the construction and maintenance of improvements within the Park authorized by the Commonwealth;

Police and emergency vehicles;

Vehicles for which the operators thereof have been issued permits (i) by the Department of Interior, prior to July 1, 1984, pursuant to Public Law 96-315 to travel through the Back Bay National Wildlife Refuge and (ii) by the Department to travel through the Park.

History.

1984, c. 706, § 10-21.3:2; 1988, c. 891.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1984, c. 706, cl. 2 provides that the Division of Parks and Recreation of the Department of Conservation and Economic Development is authorized to enter into an agreement with the U.S. Department of the Interior pertaining to rights of ingress and egress through Back Bay National Wildlife Refuge to False Cape State Park. Clause 2 also sets forth the terms of the agreement.

Acts 1984, c. 706, cl. 4 and 5 provide:

“4. That the provisions of this act shall be effective upon concurrent execution of this agreement by the Governor on behalf of the Commonwealth and the United States Secretary of the Interior on behalf of the United States Department of the Interior.

“5. That the instrument granting and conveying the right or license of ingress and egress along an access corridor shall be signed and executed in a manner and form approved by the Attorney General.”

This section became effective November 7, 1996, following the completion of a Memorandum of Understanding between the U.S. Department of Interior, Fish and Wildlife Service and the Commonwealth of Virginia.